Tennessee, session 114, HB2538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-9-109(f)(1), is amended by
deleting the last sentence of the subdivision and substituting:
The authority shall provide each adverse party not less than fourteen (14) days'
written notice prior to assessing a penalty under this subdivision (f)(1).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2538
012527
- 1 -